Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1934.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 102 of the act of October 15, 1980 (P.L.950, No.164), known as the Commonwealth Attorneys Act, is amended by adding a definition to read:Section 102. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the meanings given to them in this section:* * *"Right to access." The term does not include access for the purpose of satisfying discovery requests propounded on the Office of Attorney General in a civil action, unless the agency in question is a party to the action and is represented by the Office of Attorney General.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1934PN2433 - 2 - 123456789101112131415